Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201260-1807
Permit; renewal; issuance; receipt
required.

In issuing permits
or renewals under sections
60-1801 to 60-1808, the county treasurer shall
neither receive nor accept such application nor permit fee nor issue any permit
for any such camper unit unless the applicant first exhibits proof by receipt
or otherwise (1) that he or she has paid all applicable taxes and fees upon
such camper unit based on the computation thereof made in the year preceding
the year for which such application for permit is made, (2) that he or she
was the owner of another camper unit or other motor vehicles on which he or
she paid the taxes and fees during such year, or (3) that he or she owned
no camper unit or other motor vehicle upon which taxes and fees might have
been imposed during such year.

Laws 1969, c. 627, § 7, p. 2528;

Laws 1997, LB 271, § 35;

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 262;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 96.
July 19, 2012